Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-107
Supplemental principles of law.

(ULLCA 107) Unless displaced
by particular provisions of the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act, the principles of law and equity supplement the act.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 7.